Nevada, session 83, SB426.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 484B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Lake Tahoe Basin Scenic Byway Corridor Recreation
Safety Zone is hereby created in the Lake Tahoe Region,
consisting of any portion of U.S. Highway 50, Nevada State Route
28, Nevada State Route 431 and Nevada State Route 207 that is
located in the Lake Tahoe Region and directly connected to a
recreational destination or that has otherwise been designated as a
Scenic Byway.
2. Within the Lake Tahoe Basin Scenic Byway Corridor
Recreation Safety Zone, the Department of Transportation and
any local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the Region
may:
(a) Place traffic control devices on any portion of highway in
the Safety Zone and implement measures of traffic calming;
(b) Prohibit or restrict parking on the shoulder of any highway
in the Safety Zone; and
(c) Prohibit or restrict a person from stopping, leaving
standing or parking a vehicle anywhere the Department of
Transportation or the local law enforcement agency determines
such activities are dangerous to other persons operating a vehicle
on a highway in the Safety Zone or would duly interfere with the
free movement of traffic on such highway.
 A person shall not stop, park or leave standing any vehicle in
violation of a traffic control device, prohibition or restriction
established pursuant to this subsection.
3. In addition to the provisions of subsection 2:
(a) The Department of Transportation may, on any land
owned or held by the Department of Transportation:
(1) Establish and collect fees for public parking; and
(2) Enter into an agreement with one or more state
agencies, local governments, local governmental agencies or the
Tahoe transportation district, as applicable, to enforce and collect
any fee established pursuant to this paragraph for public parking;
and
(b) The Department of Transportation or a law enforcement
agency may enter into agreements with one or more state
agencies, local governments with jurisdiction in the Region, local
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
governmental agencies or the Tahoe transportation district
relating to parking in the Safety Zone, including, without
limitation:
(1) The development of public parking in any right-of-way
or land owned by the State and pedestrian pathways for residents
and visitors who use such public parking to move from the public
parking to a recreational destination; and
(2) The enforcement of parking restrictions and
prohibitions established pursuant to subsection 2.
4. Any agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), may
authorize the state agency, local government, local governmental
agency or the Tahoe transportation district to appoint employees,
who must be directly employed by the state agency, local
government, local governmental agency or Tahoe transportation
district, as applicable, to issue citations or notices of
noncompliance, manually or electronically, for a violation of any
parking restriction or prohibition established pursuant to
subsection 2 or a requirement to pay a fee established pursuant to
subsection 3. A citation or notice of noncompliance authorized by
this paragraph and issued pursuant to the agreement has the same
force and effect as a citation or notice issued by a peace officer.
The employee must file the original or a copy of the citation or
notice of compliance in the manner required pursuant to
NRS 484A.680.
(b) Must prohibit the issuance of citations or notices of
noncompliance in any area within the Lake Tahoe Basin Scenic
Byway Corridor Recreation Safety Zone where there is no access
to a recreation destination from the public parking using public
transit or pedestrian pathways.
(c) Must require the state agency, local government, local
governmental agency or Tahoe transportation district, as
applicable, for any employee appointed pursuant to paragraph (a),
to:
(1) Establish minimum qualifications;
(2) Provide training to the employee before the employee
may issue citations or notices of noncompliance; and
(3) Provide appropriate equipment to the employee,
including, without limitation, uniforms or identifying attire and
books or electronic devices for issuing citations or notices of
noncompliance; and
(d) If the agreement is made with the Tahoe transportation
district, must require that any fees or fines collected by the Tahoe
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
transportation district be used in the Lake Tahoe Region to
manage parking in the Region.
5. A state agency, local government or local governmental
agency that appoints an employee to issue citations or notices of
noncompliance pursuant to subsection 4 is not liable for the
negligent acts or omissions of such an employee unless:
(a) The employee made a specific promise or representation to
a natural person who relied upon the promise or representation to
the person’s detriment; or
(b) The conduct of the employee affirmatively caused the
harm.
 The provisions of this section are not intended to abrogate the
principle of common law that the duty of governmental entities to
provide services is a duty owed to the public, not to individual
persons.
6. Any fee established by the Department of Transportation
pursuant to subsection 3 and collected by the Department of
Transportation, a state agency, a local government or a local
governmental agency must be used to manage parking in the Lake
Tahoe Region, including, without limitation:
(a) The operation and maintenance of public parking and
pedestrian pathways;
(b) The enforcement of parking restrictions and prohibitions
and fees for public parking;
(c) The installation of adequate signage to support safety and
provide information to any person using the public parking; and
(d) The development, operation and maintenance of amenities
for any person using the public parking, including, without
limitation, restrooms and trash cans.
7. Any fine collected by the Department of Transportation, a
law enforcement agency, a state agency, a local government or a
local governmental agency pursuant to this section must be used
in the Lake Tahoe Region for enforcing parking restrictions and
prohibitions in the Safety Zone.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Lake Tahoe Region” or “Region” includes Lake Tahoe
and the adjacent parts of Douglas and Washoe Counties and
Carson City lying within the Tahoe Basin in the State of Nevada.
(b) “Public parking” means a parking space or parking
facility, including, without limitation, a parking deck, parking
garage, parking structure or paved or unpaved parking lot, that
members of the public are invited or permitted to enter and use.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(c) “Scenic Byway” has the meaning ascribed to it in the
National Scenic Byways Program, as issued by the United States
Federal Highway Administration in 60 Federal Register 26,759 on
May 18, 1995.
(d) “Tahoe transportation district” means the Tahoe
transportation district established by Article IX of the Tahoe
Regional Planning Compact.
(e) “Traffic calming”:
(1) Means a combination of measures and techniques
intended to:
(I) Reduce vehicular speeds;
(II) Promote safe and pleasant conditions for motorists,
bicyclists, pedestrians and residents;
(III) Improve the environment and usability of
roadways;
(IV) Improve real and perceived safety for nonmotorized
traffic; or
(V) Achieve any combination of the purposes set forth in
sub-subparagraphs (I) to (IV), inclusive.
(2) Does not include any combination of measures and
techniques that reduces the number of lanes for traveling on any
portion of U.S. Highway 50, Nevada State Route 28, Nevada State
Route 431 or Nevada State Route 207 that is part of the Lake
Tahoe Basin Scenic Byway Corridor Recreation Safety Zone
created by subsection 1.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)